Yamls/Pron-nem_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
#  The were proofread for golden standard by Larisa Ponomareva 2019-10-22
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

   Pronoun – нем: # Negative Pronoun 'Ei mikään / Ничто'
    нем+Pron+Neg+Sg+Nom: нем
    нем+Pron+Neg+Sg+Acc: нем
    нем+Pron+Neg+Sg+Gen: немлӧн
    нем+Pron+Neg+Sg+Abl: немлісь
    нем+Pron+Neg+Sg+Dat: немлӧ
    нем+Pron+Neg+Sg+Ins: немӧн 
    нем+Pron+Neg+Sg+Com: немкӧт
    нем+Pron+Neg+Sg+Car: немтӧг
    нем+Pron+Neg+Sg+Cns: немла
    нем+Pron+Neg+Sg+Cmpr: немся
    нем+Pron+Neg+Sg+Ine: немын
    нем+Pron+Neg+Sg+Ela: немись
    нем+Pron+Neg+Sg+Ill: немӧ
    нем+Pron+Neg+Sg+Apr: немлань
    нем+Pron+Neg+Sg+Egr: немсянь
    нем+Pron+Neg+Sg+Prl: немӧт
    нем+Pron+Neg+Sg+TerI: немӧдз
    нем+Pron+Neg+Sg+TerII: немви
    нем+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprIne: немланьын
    нем+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprEla: немланись
    нем+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprIll: немланьӧ
    нем+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprEgr: немланьсянь
    нем+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprPrl: немланьӧт
    нем+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprTerI: немланьӧдз
    нем+Pron+Neg+Sg+AprTerII: немланьви
